Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
PART 5
LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNIFORM ACCOUNTING LAW

29-1-501. Short title.

This part 5 shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Local Government Uniform Accounting Law".

Source:

L. 65:

p. 857, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 88-5-1.

29-1-502. Definitions.

As used in this part 5, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Local government" means any authority, county, municipality, city and county, district, or other political subdivision of the state of Colorado, any institution, department, agency, or authority of any of the foregoing, including any county or municipal housing authority; and any other entity, organization, or corporation formed by intergovernmental agreement or other contract between or among any of the foregoing. Effective January 1, 1990, the office of the county public trustee shall be deemed an agency of the county for the purposes of this part 5. "Local government" does not include the fire and police pension association, any public entity insurance pool formed pursuant to state law, the university of Colorado hospital authority created in section 23-21-503, or any association of political subdivisions formed pursuant to section 29-1-401.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 857, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 88-5-2.

L. 81:

(2)(e) added, p. 1401, § 1, effective April 24.

L. 89:

(2) R&RE, p. 1256, § 3, effective May 2.

L. 91:

(2) amended, p. 588, § 13, effective October 1.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-294), ch. 264, p. 1411, § 100, effective May 25.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the act amending subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 99, Session Laws of Colorado 1991.

29-1-503. Appointment of advisory committee - powers and duties.

The governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint a six-member advisory committee on governmental accounting to assist the state auditor in formulating and prescribing a classification of accounts. The committee consists of the following members:

One member who is a member of the Colorado society of certified public accountants; and

Five members who are active in finance matters either as elected officials or finance officers employed by one of the following units of local government: Counties, cities and counties, cities and towns, school districts and local college districts, local improvement or special service districts, or other local entities having authority under the general laws of this state to levy taxes or impose assessments.

Members shall be appointed for terms of four years; except that the terms shall be staggered so that no more than two members' terms expire in the same year.

The state auditor and the controller shall be ex officio nonvoting members of the advisory committee on governmental accounting; except that the state auditor shall act as chairman of the committee and shall cast a vote only in the case of a tie.

Any decision shall be adopted only upon the majority vote of the members present.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 93, p. 674, § 10, effective May 1, 1993.)

Source:

L. 65:

p. 857, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 88-5-3.

L. 86:

(5) added, p. 423, § 51, effective March 26.

L. 87:

(2) amended, p. 912, § 24, effective June 15.

L. 93:

(5) amended, p. 674, § 10, effective May 1.

L. 2017:

(1) amended, (SB 17-294), ch. 264, p. 1412, § 101, effective May 25.

L. 2022:

(1) and (2) amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 72, § 95, effective February 25; (1)(b) amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2981, § 69, effective August 10.

29-1-504. State auditor - powers and duties.

The state auditor shall formulate, prescribe, and publish a classification of accounts with the approval of the advisory committee on governmental accounting which shall be uniform for every level of local government as defined in section 29-1-502; except that each level of government may be classified according to population, and, in that event, each classification of accounts shall be uniform within each class; and except that the classification of accounts prescribed for the purpose of public schools shall be subject to the approval of the state board of education; and further except that the classification of accounts prescribed for the purpose of local college districts shall be subject to the approval of the state board for community colleges and occupational education.

Upon completion of the classification of accounts for each level of government, the state auditor shall distribute the published copies of the classification of accounts promulgated by the state auditor's office to each unit of local government defined in section 29-1-502 and may distribute such copies to other interested parties. Any amendments or alterations to the original published copies must also be distributed to each unit of local government in the same manner.

Upon request of the local government officials, the state auditor shall assist local government officials in implementing the classification of accounts promulgated pursuant to this section. Any travel and subsistence expense incurred by the state auditor in performing the requests must be paid by the local government.

In accordance with subsection (1) of this section, the state auditor shall formulate classifications of inventory accounts for local governments; such accounts shall be required to be kept only with respect to items of property having an original cost that equals or exceeds an amount established by the governing body of each local government, unless such items having a value of less than the amount established by such governing body are required to be inventoried by directive of the state auditor. In no event shall the amount established by the governing body of any local government pursuant to this subsection (4) exceed the amount specified in rules promulgated by the state controller pursuant to section 24-30-202 regarding inventory accounts for items of state property.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 858, § 4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 88-5-4.

L. 69:

p. 698, § 2.

L. 75:

(1) amended, p. 787, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(4) amended, p. 140, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-294), ch. 264, p. 1412, § 102, effective May 25.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2982, § 70, effective August 10.

29-1-505. Annual compendium.

Upon completion of the first calendar year following the completion of the classification of accounts and at the close of each calendar year thereafter, the division of local government in the department of local affairs shall publish or cause to be published an annual compendium of local government as derived from the annual audit reports filed under the provisions of the Colorado local government audit law and shall include audit reports for any fiscal years ending within the calendar year. The compendium shall be arranged by the type of local government and by classes within each type as required by the classification of accounts promulgated under section 29-1-504; but, if an annual compendium of any type of local government is published by any state agency, such compendium may be accepted by the division of local government as a part of the annual compendium set out in this section.

The division, with the approval of the executive director of the department of local affairs, may include such other information as may be deemed important for use by local government officials to promote and encourage sound fiscal management.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 859, § 5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 88-5-5.

L. 71:

p. 959, § 1.

29-1-506. Continuing inventory.

The governing body of each local government shall make or cause to be made an annual inventory of property, both real and personal, belonging to such political subdivision; except that an inventory shall be required only with respect to items of property having an original cost that equals or exceeds an amount established by the governing body of each local government, unless such items having a value of less than the amount established by such governing body are required to be inventoried by directive of the state auditor. In no event shall the amount established by the governing body of any local government pursuant to this subsection (1) exceed the amount specified in rules promulgated by the state controller pursuant to section 24-30-202, C.R.S., regarding inventory accounts for items of state property.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 698, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 88-5-6.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 707, § 7, effective July 14.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 821, § 31, effective May 24.

L. 89:

(1) amended and (2) repealed, pp. 1259, 1260, §§ 10, 11, effective May 3.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 140, § 2, effective August 5.